Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2403] Acceptance of federal aid;
career and technical education. (a) The State accepts, together with the
benefits of all respective funds appropriated thereby, all of the provisions of
the Act of Congress approved February 23, 1917, entitled: "An Act to
provide for the promotion of vocational education; to provide for cooperation
with the states in the promotion of such education in agriculture, trade and
industries; to provide for the cooperation of the States in the preparation of
teachers of vocational subject; and to appropriate money and regulate its
expenditure" and any Acts that amend or supplement the Act.

(b) The state board for career and technical
education shall be the board of regents as designated under section [304A-301].
[L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next